Oklahoma, session 2025, SJR5.
Be it Enacted By the People

of the State of Oklahoma.”

Petitions and orders for the initiative and for the referendum

shall be filed with the Secretary of State and addressed to the

Governor of the state, who shall submit the same to the people. The

Legislature shall make suitable provisions for carrying into effect

the provisions of this article.

SECTION 2. The Secretary of State shall refer to the people for

their approval or rejection, as and in the manner provided by law,

the following proposed amendment to Section 1 of Article XXIV of the

Oklahoma Constitution to read as follows:

Section 1. Any amendment or amendments to this Constitution may

be proposed in either branch of the Legislature, and if the same

shall be agreed to by a majority of all the members elected to each

of the two (2) houses, such proposed amendment or amendments shall,

with the yeas and nays thereon, be entered in their journals and

referred by the Secretary of State to the people for their approval

or rejection, at the next regular general election, except when the

Req. No. 204 Page 2

Legi slature, by a two-thirds (2/3) vote of each house, shall order a

special election for that purpose. If a majority not less than

sixty percent (60%) of all the electors voting on any proposed

amendment at such election shall vote in favor thereof, it shall

thereby become a part of this Constitution.

No proposal for the amendment or alteration of this Constitution

which is submitted to the voters shall embrace more than one general

subject and the voters shall vote separately for or against each

proposal submitted; provided, however, that in the submission of

proposals for the amendment of this Constitution by articles, which

embrace one general subject, each proposed article shall be deemed a

single proposal or proposition.

SECTION 3. The Ballot Title for the proposed Constitutional

amendment as set forth in SECTIONS 1 and 2 of this resolution shall

be in the following form:

BALLOT TITLE

Legislative Referendum No. ____ State Question No. ____

THE GIST OF THE PROPOSITION IS AS FOLLOWS:

This measure would amend Section 3 of Article 5 of the Oklahoma

Constitution. It would increase the vote required to pass an

initiative or referendum petition from a simple majority to a

60% vote of the electors voting on the petition. This measure

would also amend Section 1 of Article 24 of the Oklahoma

Constitution. It would increase the vote required to pass a

Req. No. 204 Page 3

constitutional amendment proposed by the Legislature from a

simple majority to a 60% vote of the electors voting on the

amendment.

SHALL THE PROPOSAL BE APPROVED?

FOR THE PROPOSAL — YES _____________

AGAINST THE PROPOSAL — NO _____________

SECTION 4. The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall,

immediately after the passage of this resolution, prepare and file

one copy thereof, including the Ballot Title set forth in SECTION 3

hereof, with the Secretary of State and one copy with the Attorney

General.



60-1-204 TEK 1/14/2025 3:54:49 PM























Req. No. 204 Page 4